src/main/resources/Stemmer.sbl
/*
    Extra rule for -nisse ending added 11 Dec 2009
*/

routines (
           prelude
           mark_regions
           R1 R2
           Step_1
		   Step_3
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( p1 p2 )

groupings ( v ca sa)

stringescapes {}

/* special characters (in MS-DOS Latin I) */

stringdef cx   hex '10D' // cep
stringdef cy   hex '107' // cevap
stringdef zx   hex '17E' // zaba
stringdef sx   hex '161' // suma
stringdef dx   hex '111' //djak

define v 'aeiou' 
define sa '{cx}{cy}{zx}{sx}{dx}'
define ca 'bvgdzjklmnprstfhc' + sa


define prelude as (

    do repeat goto (
        ca ['ije'] ca <- 'e' 
    )
	
	do repeat goto (
        ca['je'] ca <- 'e' 
    )
)

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit

    gopast v  gopast non-v setmark p1
    gopast sa setmark p2

)

backwardmode (

    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 == 0
